Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-320.10
Flood control; construction of works; acquisition of rights-of-way and easements; eminent domain; procedure.

In any county or counties described in section 23-320.08, where it is necessary as a condition to the construction of any flood control works or other similar works of improvement as provided in sections 23-320.08 to 23-320.12, that the county furnish the necessary lands, rights-of-way, or easements therefor, the county board may acquire such lands, rights-of-way, or easements as may be necessary, and the board may acquire the same by purchase or by gift or by the exercise of the right of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1963, c. 106, § 3, p. 433.